Illinois, session 104th, HB1786.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 51-26 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1-26 new)7    Sec. 1-26. Ranked-Choice Voting in State and Local 8Elections Task Force. 9    (a) The Ranked-Choice Voting in State and Local Elections 10Task Force is created. The Task Force shall study the 11possibility of implementing ranked-choice voting for State and 12local elections. The Task Force shall have the following 13duties:14        (1) to engage election officials, interested groups, 15    and members of the public for the purpose of assessing the 16    adoption and implementation of ranked-choice voting in 17    State and local elections, beginning in the 2029 18    consolidated election;19        (2) to review standards used to certify or approve the 20    use of a voting system, including the standards adopted by 21    the United States Election Assistance Commission and the 22    State Board of Elections;23        (3) to advise whether the voting system used by this   HB1786- 2 -LRB104 10838 SPS 20919 b1    State's election authorities would be able to accommodate 2    alternative methods of voting, including, but not limited 3    to, ranked-choice voting; and4        (4) to make recommendations or suggestions for changes 5    to the Election Code or administrative rules for 6    certification of voting systems in this State to 7    accommodate alternative methods of voting, including 8    ranked-choice voting.9    (b) On or before June 30, 2027, the Task Force shall 10publish a final report of its findings and recommendations. 11The report shall, at a minimum, detail findings and 12recommendations related to the duties of the Task Force and 13set out a realistic timeline for implementation of 14ranked-choice voting for State and local elections. The 15ranked-choice voting implementation timeline shall account for 16the time needed and costs incurred to upgrade or replace 17current election systems, conduct a rigorous public education 18campaign, and enact legislation and propose and adopt 19administrative rules or guidelines that would result in the 20transparent and timely production of election results and 21audits.22    (c) The Task Force shall consist of the following members:23        (1) 4 members appointed by the Senate President, 24    including 2 members of the Senate and 2 members of the 25    public;26        (2) 4 members appointed by the Speaker of the House of   HB1786- 3 -LRB104 10838 SPS 20919 b1    Representatives, including 2 members of the House of 2    Representatives and 2 members of the public;3        (3) 4 members appointed by the Minority Leader of the 4    Senate, including 2 members of the Senate and 2 members of 5    the public;6        (4) 4 members appointed by the Minority Leader of the 7    House of Representatives, including 2 members of the House 8    of Representatives and 2 members of the public; and9        (5) 4 members appointed by the Governor, including at 10    least 2 members with knowledge and experience 11    administering elections.12    (d) Appointments to the Task Force shall be made within 30 13days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 14104th General Assembly. Members shall serve without 15compensation.16    (e) The Task Force shall meet at the call of a co-chair at 17least quarterly to fulfill its duties. At the first meeting of 18the Task Force, the Task Force shall elect one co-chair from 19the members appointed by the Senate President and one co-chair 20from the members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 21Representatives.22    (f) The State Board of Elections shall provide 23administrative support for the Task Force.24    (g) This Section is repealed, and the Task Force is 25dissolved, on July 1, 2027. 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB1786- 4 -LRB104 10838 SPS 20919 b1becoming law.